New York, session 2025-2026, A8717.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 51 of the multiple dwelling law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 8 to read as follows: 3 8. A record of all elevator or vertical transportation maintenance, 4 operation issues and repairs shall be maintained and kept up to date by 5 the owner of such multiple dwelling. Such owners shall record when 6 elevators or other form of vertical transportation: (a) are inoperable 7 or out of service; (b) require emergency service; (c) require preventa- 8 tive maintenance; or (d) require mechanical repairs, including but not 9 limited to door malfunctions, hydraulic system repairs, and maintenance 10 to the electronic control system or maintenance to the elevator carriage 11 or hoistway. Such records shall be made available to the municipal 12 department having jurisdiction over such elevator or vertical transpor- 13 tation violations. Tenants of the multiple dwelling shall have the 14 opportunity to review such records, and copies of such records shall be 15 provided upon request. Copies of such records may be used to prohibit 16 individual apartment improvement increases or temporary major capital 17 improvement increases as described in section eight-a of the emergency 18 housing rent control law. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 20 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11303-05-5